Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB424.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Energy and Water Efficiency Standards Act.Section 2. General purpose, legislative findings and scope.(a) General purpose.--This act establishes minimum energy and water efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in this Commonwealth.(b) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds that:(1) Efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in this Commonwealth assure consumers and businesses that the products meet minimum efficiency performance levels, resulting in reduced energy and water 1234567891011121314151617 waste and saving consumers and businesses money on utility bills.(2) Efficiency standards contribute to the economy of this Commonwealth by helping to better balance supply and demand for both energy and water, resulting in reduced pressure that creates higher natural gas, electricity and water prices. By saving consumers and businesses money on utility bills, efficiency standards help the Commonwealth and local economy save on utility bills that can be spent on local goods and services.(3) The efficiency standards save energy and thus reduce pollution and other environmental impacts associated with the production, distribution and use of electricity, natural gas and other fuels.(4) The water efficiency standards save water and thus reduce the strain on the water supply. Improved water efficiency can reduce or delay the need for water and sewer infrastructure improvements.(5) The efficiency standards can make electricity and natural gas systems more reliable by reducing the strain on systems during peak demand periods. Improved efficiency can reduce or delay the need for new power plants, power transmission lines and power distribution system upgrades as well as new and expanded gas pipelines.(c) Scope.--The provisions of this act apply to:(1) Commercial dishwashers.(2) Commercial fryers.(3) Commercial hot-food holding cabinets.(4) Commercial ovens.(5) Commercial steam cookers.20250SB0424PN0397 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Faucets.(7) Gas fireplaces.(8) High CRI fluorescent lamps, cold-temperature fluorescent lamps and impact-resistant fluorescent lamps.(9) Portable electric spas.(10) Residential ventilating fans.(11) Showerheads.(12) Spray sprinkler bodies.(13) Urinals.(14) Water closets.(15) Water coolers.(d) Limitation.--Nothing in this act may be construed to:(1) Apply to new products manufactured in this Commonwealth and sold outside of this Commonwealth.(2) Apply to new products manufactured outside of this Commonwealth and sold at wholesale inside this Commonwealth for final retail sale and installation outside of this Commonwealth.(3) Apply to products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction.(4) Apply to products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.(5) Constitute a ban on products covered under this act.(6) Prohibit the use, sale or installation of used products or parts.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessory." A component that can, at the discretion of the 20250SB0424PN0397 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 user, be readily added, removed or replaced and that, when removed, will not prevent the fitting from fulfilling its primary function. The term includes aerators, handheld shower assemblies, showerheads and in-line flow controls."Board." The Environmental Quality Board."Cold-only unit." A water cooler that emits cold water only."Cold-temperature fluorescent lamp." A fluorescent lamp that is not a compact fluorescent lamp that:(1) is specifically designed to start at -20°F when used with a ballast conforming to the requirements of ANSI C78.81 and ANSI C78.901; and(2) is expressly designated as a cold-temperature lamp both in markings on the lamp and in marketing materials, including catalogs, sales literature and promotional material."Commercial dishwasher." A machine designed to clean and sanitize plates, pots, pans, glasses, cups, bowls, utensils and trays by applying sprays of detergent solution, with or without blasting media granules, and a sanitizing rinse."Commercial fryer." An appliance, including a cooking vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the cooking food is essentially supported by displacement of the cooking fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to the cooking fluid by means of an immersed electric element or band-wrapped vessel electric fryers or by heat transfer from gas burners through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through the cooking fluid."Commercial hot-food holding cabinet." A heated, fully enclosed compartment with one or more solid or transparent doors, designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has 20250SB0424PN0397 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been cooked using a separate appliance. The term does not include heated glass merchandizing cabinets, drawer warmers or cook-and-hold appliances."Commercial oven." A chamber designed for heating, roasting or baking food by conduction, convection, radiation or electromagnetic energy."Commercial steam cooker." A device with one or more food-steaming compartments in which the energy in the steam is transferred to the food by direct contact. The term may include countertop models, wall-mounted models and floor models mounted on a stand, pedestal or cabinet-style base."Compensation." Money or any other source of value, regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services rendered."Cook and cold unit." A water cooler that emits both cold and room-temperature water."Decorative gas fireplace." A vented fireplace, including an appliance that is freestanding, recessed, zero clearance, log set or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled by natural gas or propane, is marked for decorative use only and is not equipped with a thermostat or intended for use as a heater."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Dual-flush water closet." A water closet incorporating a feature that allows the user to flush the water closet with either a reduced or full volume of water."EPA." The United States Environmental Protection Agency."Faucet." A private lavatory faucet, residential kitchen faucet, metering faucet, public lavatory faucet or replacement accessories for a public lavatory faucet or a metering faucet.20250SB0424PN0397 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Gas fireplace." A decorative gas fireplace or heating gas fireplace."Handheld showerhead." A showerhead that can be held or fixed in place for the purpose of spraying water onto a bather and that is connected to a flexible hose."Heating gas fireplace." A vented fireplace, including an appliance that is freestanding, recessed, zero clearance or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled by natural gas or propane and which is not a decorative fireplace."High color rendering index fluorescent lamp" or "high CRI fluorescent lamp." A fluorescent lamp with a color rendering index of 87 or greater that is not a compact fluorescent lamp."Hot and cold unit." A water cooler that emits both hot and cold water. The term includes a cooler that emits room-temperature water."Impact-resistant fluorescent lamp." A fluorescent lamp that is not a compact fluorescent lamp that:(1) has a coating or equivalent technology that is compliant with NSF/ANSI 51 and is designed to contain the glass if the glass envelope of the lamp is broken; and(2) is designated and marketed for the intended application with:(i) the designation on the lamp packaging; and(ii) marketing materials that identify the lamp as being impact resistant, shatter resistant, shatter proof or shatter protected."Metering faucet." A self-closing faucet that dispenses a specific volume of water for each actuation cycle. For the purpose of this definition, the volume or cycle duration can be fixed or adjustable.20250SB0424PN0397 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "On-demand." A method of heating water in a water cooler as water is requested."Plumbing fixture." An exchangeable device that connects to a plumbing system to deliver and drain away water and waste."Portable electric spa." A factory-built electric spa or hot tub that is supplied with equipment for heating and circulating water at the time of sale or sold separately for subsequent attachment."Pressure regulator." A device that maintains constant operating pressure immediately downstream from the device, given higher pressure upstream."Public lavatory faucet." A fitting intended to be installed in nonresidential bathrooms that are exposed to walk-in traffic."Replacement accessory." A component sold as a replacement, separate from a faucet to which the component is meant to be attached."Replacement aerator." An aerator sold as a replacement, separate from the faucet to which the aerator is intended to be attached."Residential ventilating fan." A ceiling-mounted or wall-mounted fan or remotely mounted in-line fan designed to be used in a bathroom or utility room, whose purpose is to move air from inside the building to the outdoors."Showerhead." A component or set of components distributed in commerce for attachment to a single supply fitting for spraying water onto a bather, typically from an overhead position. The term does not include a safety showerhead. The term includes a handheld showerhead that can be held or fixed in place for the purpose of spraying water onto a bather from a flexible hose.20250SB0424PN0397 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Spray sprinkler body." The exterior case or shell of a sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping system designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice."Storage type." The storage of thermally conditioned water in a reservoir in the water cooler that is available instantaneously. The term includes point-of-use, dry storage compartment and bottled water coolers."Trough-type urinal." A urinal designed for simultaneous use by two or more individuals."Urinal." A plumbing fixture that receives only liquid body waste and conveys the waste through a trap into a drainage system."Water closet." A plumbing fixture having a water-containing receptor that receives liquid and solid body waste through an exposed integral trap into a drainage system. The term includes a dual-flush water closet."Water cooler." A freestanding device that consumes energy to cool or heat potable water."WaterSense." A partnership program by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and independent, third-party licensed certifying bodies that certify products for EPA criteria for water efficiency and performance by following testing and certification protocols specific to each product category and bear the WaterSense label under 42 U.S.C. § 6294 (relating to labeling).Section 4. Standards.(a) Regulations.--Not later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the board shall promulgate regulations, in accordance with the provisions of section 502 of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the 20250SB0424PN0397 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Conservation and Natural Resources Act, establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products listed in section 2.(b) Minimum standards.--The regulations shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards:(1) Commercial dishwashers included in the scope of version 3.0 of the EPA's "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Dishwashers" shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.(2) Commercial fryers included in the scope of version 2.0 of the EPA's "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Fryers" shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.(3) Commercial hot-food holding cabinets shall meet the qualification criteria of version 2.0 of the EPA's "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Hot Food Holding Cabinets."(4) Commercial ovens included in the scope of version 3.0 of the EPA's "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Ovens" shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.(5) Commercial steam cookers shall meet the requirements of version 1.2 of the EPA's "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Steam Cookers."(6) Faucets, except for metering faucets, shall meet the following standards when tested in accordance with 10 CFR Pt. 430 Appendix S to Subpt. B (relating to uniform test method for measuring the water consumption of faucets and showerheads):(i) Private lavatory faucets and lavatory faucet 20250SB0424PN0397 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement accessories included in the scope of the WaterSense specification for lavatory faucets, version 1.0, shall meet a maximum flow rate of 1.5 gallons per minute and meet the performance criteria and other certification criteria of that specification.(ii) Residential kitchen faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch, with optional temporary flow of 2.2 gallons per minute, provided that the faucets and aerators default to a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch after each use.(iii) Public lavatory faucets and replacement aerators may not exceed a maximum flow rate of 0.5 gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch.(iv) Metering faucets shall not exceed a volumetric measure of water of 0.20 gallons per activation cycle and shall have no maximum flow rate, specified in gallons per minute, when tested in accordance with Clause 5.4.2.3.1 B of American Society of Mechanical Engineers A112.18.1/CSA B125.1.(7) Gas fireplaces shall comply with the following requirements:(i) Gas fireplaces shall be capable of automatically extinguishing a pilot flame when the main gas burner flame is extinguished.(ii) Gas fireplaces shall prevent an ignition source for the main gas burner flame from operating continuously for more than seven days from last use of the main gas burner.20250SB0424PN0397 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Heating gas fireplaces shall have a fireplace efficiency equal to or greater than 50% when tested in accordance with CSA P.4.1:15, "Testing Method For Measuring Fireplace Efficiency," as amended or revised.(8) High CRI fluorescent lamps, cold-temperature fluorescent lamps and impact-resistant fluorescent lamps shall meet the minimum efficiency requirements contained in 10 CFR 430.32(n)(4) (relating to energy and water conservation standards and their compliance dates) in effect on January 1, 2023, as measured in accordance with 10 CFR Pt. 430 Appendix R to Subpt. B (relating to uniform test method for measuring electrical and photometric characteristics of general service fluorescent lamps, incandescent reflector lamps, and general service incandescent lamps) in effect on January 1, 2023.(9) Portable electric spas shall meet the requirements contained in ANSI/APSP/ICC-14-2019, the American National Standard for Portable Electric Spa Energy Efficiency.(10) In-line residential ventilating fans shall have a fan motor efficacy of no less than 2.8 cubic feet per minute per watt. All other residential ventilating fans shall have a fan motor efficacy of no less than 1.4 cubic feet per minute per watt for airflows less than 90 cubic feet per minute and no less than 2.8 cubic feet per minute per watt for other airflows when tested in accordance with Home Ventilating Institute Publication 916 "HVI Airflow Test Procedure."(11) Showerheads may not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gallons per minute at 80 pounds per square inch when tested in accordance with 10 CFR Pt. 430 Appendix S to Subpt. B in effect on January 1, 2023.20250SB0424PN0397 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) Spray sprinkler bodies that are not specifically excluded from the scope of version 1.0 of the EPA's "WaterSense Specification for Spray Sprinkler Bodies" shall include an integral pressure regulator and shall meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and other requirements of that specification.(13) Urinals, other than trough-type urinals and those designed and marketed exclusively for use at prisons or mental health facilities, that are included within the scope of the WaterSense specification for flushing urinals, version 1.0, shall meet a maximum flush volume of 0.5 gallons per flush and meet the performance criteria and other certification criteria of that specification.(14) Water closets, other than those designed and marketed exclusively for use at prisons or mental health facilities, that are included within the scope of the WaterSense specification for tank-type toilets, version 2.0 or the WaterSense specification for flushometer valve toilets version 1.0, shall meet a maximum flush volume of 1.28 gallons per flush and meet the performance criteria and other certification criteria of their respective specification.(15) Water coolers included in the scope of the EPA's version 2.0 "Energy Star Program Requirements Product Specification for Water Coolers" shall have an on mode with no water draw and energy consumption less than or equal to the following values as measured in accordance with the test requirements of that program:(i) 0.16 kilowatt-hours per day for cold-only units and cook and cold units;(ii) 0.87 kilowatt-hours per day for storage type 20250SB0424PN0397 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hot and cold units; and(iii) 0.18 kilowatt-hours per day for on-demand hot and cold units.Section 5. Implementation.(a) Requirement of efficiency.--Except as provided in subsection (b), on or after July 1, 2027, no new product listed under section 2(c) may be sold or offered for sale, lease or rent in this Commonwealth, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards provided in section 4.(b) Restriction on installation.--One year after the date on which the sale or offering for sale of certain products becomes subject to the requirements of subsection (a), no product listed in section 2 may be installed for compensation in this Commonwealth unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards provided in section 4.Section 6. Revised standards and regulations.The board shall promulgate regulations as it deems necessary to administer and enforce this act and to establish increased efficiency standards for the products listed in section 2. In considering the revised standards, the board shall set efficiency standards on a determination that increased efficiency standards would serve to promote energy or water conservation in this Commonwealth and would be cost effective for consumers who purchase and use the products, provided that no increased efficiency standards shall become effective within one year following the adoption of any amended regulations establishing increased efficiency standards.Section 7. Testing, certification, labeling and enforcement.(a) Product testing.--The manufacturer of a product listed 20250SB0424PN0397 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in section 2 shall test samples of products in accordance with the test procedures adopted under this act. The department may adopt updated test methods when new versions of test procedures become available.(b) Compliance.--Manufacturers of new products listed in section 2 shall certify to the department, or to an approved third-party database as determined by the department, that the products are in compliance with the provisions of this act. Potential third-party databases include, but are not limited to, the modernized appliance efficiency database system, the State appliance standards database and the certified products directory. The certifications shall be based on test results under subsection (a). The board shall promulgate regulations governing the certification of the products and shall coordinate with the certification programs of other Federal and state agencies with similar standards.(c) Compliance mark, label or tag on product.--Manufacturers of new products listed in section 2 shall identify each product offered for sale or installation in this Commonwealth as in compliance with the provisions of this act by means of a mark, label or tag on the product or packaging at the time of sale or installation. The board shall promulgate regulations governing the identification of the products or packaging which shall be coordinated to the greatest practical extent with the labeling programs of other Federal and state agencies with equivalent efficiency standards or specifications, including the Energy Star Program and WaterSense. The department shall allow the use of existing marks, labels or tags which connote compliance with the efficiency requirements of this act.(d) Department testing permitted.--The department may test 20250SB0424PN0397 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 products listed in section 2. If tested products are found not to be in compliance with the minimum efficiency standards established under section 4, the department shall:(1) charge the manufacturer of the product for the cost of product purchase and testing; and(2) make information available to the Attorney General and the public on products found not to be in compliance with the standards.(e) Periodic inspections.--The department may cause periodic inspections to be made of distributors or retailers of new products listed in section 2 in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this act.(f) Complaint process.--The department shall investigate complaints received concerning violations of this act and shall report the results of the investigations to the Attorney General. The Attorney General may institute proceedings to enforce the provisions of this act. A manufacturer, distributor or retailer, or a person who installs a product listed in section 2 for compensation, who violates any provision of this act shall be issued a warning by the department for any first violation. A manufacturer, distributor or retailer, or a person who violates the provisions of this act after the issuance of a warning by the department for a first violation, shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $100 for each offense. Repeat violations shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500 for each offense. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense and each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs assessed under subsection (d).20250SB0424PN0397 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8. Abrogation of regulations.All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 9. Repeal.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the provisions of this act.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0424PN0397 - 16 - 12345678